 "We have four-month-old mice that were diabetic and now they're not," he added.
 The study is still in its early stages, as cautioned by Dr. Ehud Ur, professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and director of the Canadian Diabetes Association's clinical and scientific department.
 Like other experts, he is skeptical about the possibility of curing diabetes, pointing out that these results are not relevant for those already affected by type 1 diabetes.
 The permanent secretary of the Swedish Academy's Nobel Committee, Sara Danius, announced on Monday on Swedish Radio that the committee had given up trying to contact Bob Dylan directly to tell him he had won the 2016 Nobel Prize in Literature.
 Danius said: "Right now we are not doing anything. I have called and emailed his closest collaborator, who has replied very kindly. For the moment, that's it."
 Previously, Jamie Siminoff, CEO of Ring, stressed that the company was born when he could not hear the doorbell from his garage store.
 He said he built a Wi-Fi bell.
 Siminoff said sales increased after he appeared on Shark Tank in 2013, when the show’s panel of investors declined to fund the startup.
 Siminoff appeared on the QVC television shopping channel in late 2017.
 Ring has also reached a transactive agreement with the competing security services company, ADT Corporation.
 While there is a vaccine in development that appears to reduce mortality from Ebola, no drug has yet been found that has been clearly shown to be effective in treating the existing infection.
 A cocktail of antibodies, ZMapp, initially looked promising in the field, but formal studies have revealed lower efficacy than hoped for in preventing deaths.
 In the PALM study, ZMapp was used as a control, meaning that scientists used it as a reference and compared it to the other three therapies.
 USA Gymnastics supports the letter from the United States Olympic Committee and recognizes the absolute need for the Olympic community to work together to create a safe environment for all of its athletes.
 We agree with the USOC that the interests of our athletes and clubs, and their sport, can best be served by driving meaningful change within our organization, not by decertification.
 USA Gymnastics has commissioned an independent investigation to understand how such abuse of the scope and scale described so courageously by those who have survived Larry Nassar could have been allowed to occur for so long, and is committed to implementing any and all changes necessary or appropriate.
 USA Gymnastics and the USOC share the same goal: to make gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible so that athletes can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and accountable environment.
 In the 1960s, Brzezinski was an advisor to John F. Kennedy and later to the Lyndon B. Johnson administration.
 During the 1976 election, he advised Carter on foreign policy and served as National Security Advisor from 1977 to 1981, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 As a member of the NSA, he collaborated with Carter in the diplomatic management of international affairs, including the Camp David Accords of 1978, the normalization of relations between China and the United States in the late 1970s, the Iranian revolution (which led to the Iran hostage crisis in 1979) and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, has been nominated in all the major categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress respectively.
 The other nominations include best picture, best director, best cinematography, best costume design, best editing, best original score, best production design, best sound editing, best sound mixing and best original screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars, were nominated for Best Original Song. The studio with the most nominations was Lionsgate, with 26.
 On Sunday evening, US President Donald Trump issued a statement through his press secretary, announcing the withdrawal of US troops from Syria.
 The announcement came after a phone call between Trump and Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan.
 Turkey, the statement said, would also take over the custody of ISIS prisoners, who have been refused repatriation by European nations.
 This not only confirms that some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory already widely accepted, but provides more details than the fossils, such as color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 According to scientists, the plumage of this animal was brownish-gray on top, with a pale or carotenoid coloration on the bottom.
 The discovery also allows detailed information about the evolution of bird feathers.
 Since the dinosaur's plumage lacks the basic structure, the so-called rachis, but instead has other features typical of feathers, barbs and barbules, the researchers concluded that the rachis is probably the result of an evolutionary development subsequent to these features.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that it was not used for flight, but rather for temperature regulation or for courtship. The researchers hypothesize that, although it is the tail of a young dinosaur, the specimen shows a feathering of an adult and not the down of a chick.
 According to the researchers, despite the tail belonging to a young dinosaur, the specimen reveals a plumage of an adult specimen and not that of a chick.
 A car bomb exploded yesterday morning at the headquarters of the police in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two officers and injuring more than twenty people.
 The governor's office said that among the wounded, 19 were police officers.
 Police said the suspected attacker was a Daesh (ISIL) militant.
 They found that the Sun operates on the same basic principles as other stars: the activity of all the stars in the solar system is determined by their luminosity and rotation.
 Brightness is used in conjunction with rotation to define a star's Rossby number, which is related to the plasma flow.
 The lower the Rossby number, the less active the star is compared to magnetic reversals.
 During his trip, Iwasaki got into trouble on several occasions.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped a marriage in Nepal and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard can operate both in the 2.4Ghz and 5.0Ghz bands.
 Provided that the base station has dual radios, this will allow it to be backward compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g.
 802.11n speeds are considerably higher than previous versions, with a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbps.
 Duvall, married with two grown children, did not arouse much interest in Miller, who told the story.
 Asked for comment, Miller replied: "Mike talks a lot during the hearing... I was preparing myself so I wasn't listening to what he was saying."
 "We will strive to cut carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by a significant margin by 2020, compared with the 2005 level," Hu said.
 He did not set a precise value for the reduction, saying that it will depend on China's economic productivity.
 Hu urged developing countries to "avoid the old way of polluting first and then cleaning up".
 He also added that they should not, however, be forced to assume obligations that go beyond their stage of development, as well as their responsibilities and competencies.
 The Iraq Inquiry released its report today at 12:00 GMT.
 He warns: "No one can guarantee that any action in Iraq at this time will stop sectarian warfare, growing violence or a slide into chaos."
 The report begins with a call for an open debate and consensus in the United States about Middle East policy.
 The report is highly critical of almost all aspects of the current administration's policy towards Iraq and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 The first of its 78 recommendations calls for a new diplomatic initiative to be launched by the end of this year to protect Iraq's borders from hostile action and to re-establish diplomatic relations with its neighbours.
 Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, current senator and first lady of Argentina, announced her presidential candidacy last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers (31 miles) from Buenos Aires.
 Kirchner chose the Teatro Argentino to announce her intention to run for president, the same place where in 2005 she had launched her campaign for the Senate as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 The discussion was sparked by controversy over spending on aid and reconstruction following Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives, jokingly, labeled "Bush's New Deal for New Orleans."
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction effort focused on the awarding of reconstruction contracts to Washington insiders.
 Over four million people came to Rome to take part in the funeral.
 The people present were so numerous that it was not possible for everyone to have access to the funeral in St. Peter's Square.
 Large television screens were set up in various parts of Rome to allow people to watch the ceremony.
 Similar installations have been set up in many other Italian cities and around the world, especially in Poland, and a large number of people watched the event through them.
 Historians criticize the FBI’s past policies for focusing on easy cases, such as car thefts, in order to boost the agency’s success rate.
 The anti-obscenity initiative was funded by Congress starting in fiscal year 2005, with the specific request to the FBI to assign 10 agents to adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest score of the innings with 70 runs in just 41 balls, hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, middle order batsmen, played well and scored in collaboration hundred runs.
 Then the captain lost his wicket, and from that moment until the end of the innings India scored only 36 runs, losing 7 wickets.
 On the morning of November 16, US President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore and began his one-week stay in Asia.
 He was greeted by Singapore's Deputy Prime Minister Wong Kan Seng and Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong, with whom he discussed trade and terrorism issues.
 After a week of midterm election defeats, Bush delivered a speech on trade development in Asia.
 After a 25-minute meeting with NDP leader Jack Layton in the PMO on Tuesday, Prime Minister Stephen Harper agreed to refer the government's Clean Air Act to a committee of all parties in preparation for second reading.
 At the meeting with the Prime Minister, Layton had requested some amendments to the Conservative Party's environmental bill, urging a "thorough and complete rewrite".
 Since the federal government has intervened to take over the financing of the Mersey Hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the state government and several MPs have criticised the measure as a pre-election ploy in the run-up to the federal election in November.
 Prime Minister John Howard has said the aim of the gesture, thanks to an extra donation of 45 million Australian dollars, was only to protect the hospital's facilities from downgrading by the Tasmanian government.
 According to the latest bulletin, sea level readings have indicated the generation of a tsunami. Near Pago Pago and Niue, activity consistent with that of a tsunami has been recorded.
 No damage to property or people was reported in Tonga, however, electricity was temporarily disrupted and this, as reported, prevented the Tongan authorities from receiving the tsunami warning from the PTWC.
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii near the coast were closed for the entire day on Wednesday, despite the warnings having been lifted.
 The announcement was welcomed by US President George W. Bush.
 Gordon Johndroe, Bush's spokesman, called the North's pledge "a fundamental step toward the goal of denuclearizing the Korean peninsula."
 On today's day the tenth storm of the season of Atlantic hurricanes, subtropical cyclone Jerry, has formed in the Atlantic Ocean.
 According to the National Hurricane Center (NHC), Jerry is no longer a threat to land.
 According to an estimate by the USACE, 6 inches of rain could break through the previously damaged levees.
 The Ninth Ward, where Hurricane Katrina had caused flooding up to 20 feet high, is now almost completely submerged as the water has breached the levee nearby.
 Water is spilling over a 100-foot section of the levee.
 Commons administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his disapproval of the deletions during his chat with Wikinews last month.
 "Basically [Wales] lied to us from the beginning. First, by acting as if it was for legal reasons. Second, by pretending to listen to us until the moment of the actual deletion of the works by him."
 In response to community discomfort, efforts have been made to draft a policy regarding sexual content on the site, which hosts millions of openly licensed multimedia content.
 The activity carried out was mostly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate the surveys carried out of the Sagittarius galaxy.
 The team wanted to see the effect of tidal forces between the dark matter in this galaxy and the dark matter in the Milky Way.
 Just as the Moon exerts a force of attraction on the Earth that generates the tides, the Milky Way also exerts a force on the Sagittarius galaxy.
 The scientists were able to deduce that the effects of dark matter on other dark matter are the same effects that "normal" matter has.
 This theory suggests that much of the dark matter around a galaxy is collected in a kind of halo, made up of a multitude of small particles.
 Television reports show white smoke pouring from the plant.
 Local authorities are urging people living near the plant to stay indoors, turn off air conditioners and not to drink tap water.
 According to the Japan Nuclear Energy Safety Organization, radioactive cesium and iodine were detected at the plant.
 The authorities' hypothesis is that this indicates a break and a consequent loss of uranium fuel containers at the site.
 Dr Tony Moll has identified extensively drug-resistant tuberculosis (XDR-TB) in the South African province of KwaZulu-Natal.
 According to a statement in an interview, this new variant was "highly concerning and alarming, because of the high mortality rate".
 According to Dr. Moll, some patients may have contracted the microbe inside the hospital, and at least two of them were healthcare workers at the hospital itself.
 In a year, an infected person can infect from 10 to 15 close contacts.
 Nevertheless, the percentage of XDR-TB in the entire group of people affected by tuberculosis still seems low; 6,000 out of a total of 330,000 people infected at a given time in South Africa.
 The collision between the satellites, both weighing more than 1,000 pounds and traveling at about 17,500 miles per hour, occurred 491 miles from Earth.
 Scientists say the collision caused an explosion.
 They are still trying to determine the size of the crash and what consequences it will have on Earth.
 The US Strategic Command of the US Department of Defense is keeping track of the debris.
 The results of the analysis of the tracks will be published on a public website.
 Ohio authorities say a doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will be charged with aggravated murder after the body of his mother was found in the trunk of her car on Wednesday.
 Dr. Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in Ohio, in Blue Ash, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, lying on the ground next to the road wearing a T-shirt and underwear, apparently under the influence of drugs.
 He directed the officers to his old black Oldsmobile Intrigue that was 500 feet away.
 There, wrapped in blood-stained blankets, was the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53.
 According to the police, the body had been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the seasonal disease occurred at the end of July.
 Pigs are carriers of the disease, which is then transmitted to humans through mosquito bites.
 The Indian government, spurred by the epidemic, has taken some measures such as deploying people to catch pigs in the worst-hit areas, distributing thousands of mosquito nets and spraying pesticides.
 The government has also promised several million doses of vaccine against encephalitis, so that next year health facilities will not be unprepared.
 Delivery of vaccines to historically hard-hit areas this year has been delayed because of a lack of funding and because they have been given a low priority status compared to other diseases.
 Three years after his move to Sweden in 1956, Słania began working for the Swedish Post, becoming its chief engraver.
 He has created more than 1,000 stamps, both for Sweden and for 28 other countries.
 The quality and detail of his work is so well recognized that he has become one of the very few "household names" among philatelists, with some specializing in collecting only his work.
 In 2000 it got its 1000th stamp, the magnificent "Great Deeds by Swedish Kings" by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, which is listed in the Guinness Book of Records.
 His work also included engraving the banknotes of many countries. Recent examples of this work include the portraits of the Prime Minister on the front of the new Canadian $5 and $100 banknotes.
 Gibson was taken to hospital after the accident, but died shortly after.
 The truck driver, 64, was uninjured in the crash.
 The vehicle involved was removed from the scene of the accident the same day, around 12:00 GMT.
 A person who worked in a garage near the accident site said: "There were children waiting to cross the road, all of them were crying and screaming."
 They all returned from the place where the accident had happened.
 Other topics on the Bali agenda include saving the world's last remaining forests and sharing technologies to support the growth of developing nations in less polluting ways.
 The UN also hopes to create a fund to help countries affected by global warming to deal with its impacts.
 The money could be used to build flood-resistant homes, improve water management and diversify crops.
 Fluke wrote that efforts by some to discourage women from speaking openly about women's health have failed.
 She came to this conclusion after receiving a multitude of positive and encouraging comments from both men and women who are pushing for contraceptive drugs to be recognized as a medical necessity.
 At the end of the fighting, after the wounded had been taken to hospital, about 40 of the remaining prisoners remained on the square, refusing to return to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to resolve the situation, but the demands of the inmates are unclear.
 Between 10:00 p.m. and 11:00 p.m. MDT the inmates set fire to the courtyard.
 Shortly after, riot police entered the courtyard and cornered the inmates using tear gas.
 Firefighters eventually managed to put out the fire at 23:35.
 Following the construction of the dam in 1963, seasonal flooding that spread sediment along the river course has stopped.
 This sediment was instrumental in creating both beaches and sandbars that became habitats for wildlife.
 As a result, two species of fish have become extinct and two more are at risk of extinction, including the snail darter.
 Even though the flood will only raise the water level by a few metres, the authorities hope that it will be enough to restore the eroded sandbanks further downstream.
 No tsunami warning was issued and according to the Jakarta geophysical agency, no alert will be issued since the quake did not reach the 6.5 magnitude level.
 Although there was no risk of a tsunami, residents began to panic and abandoned their homes and businesses.
 Although Winfrey gave a tearful farewell, she assured her fans that she would be back.
 "This is not a goodbye. This is closing a chapter and opening a new one."
 The final results of the presidential and parliamentary elections in Namibia saw the re-election of incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba, who won a significant lead.
 In the parliamentary elections, the ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organisation (SWAPO), also won a majority.
 The coalition and Afghan forces reached the area to secure the site, then other coalition aircraft arrived to provide support.
 The accident occurred in high mountains and is believed to have been caused by enemy fire.
 The search efforts for the crash site face bad weather and rough terrain.
 The medical charity Mangala, Doctors Without Borders and the World Health Organization say this is the worst outbreak the country has seen.
 MSF spokesperson Richard Veerman said: "Angola is about to experience the worst epidemic ever and the situation in the country remains very serious."
 Today at 10:00 the weather was magnificent when the games started and, despite a sprinkle of rain in the morning that lasted very little, it was a perfect day for the 7s rugby.
 South Africa, first seed of the tournament, started with the right foot by winning easily against Zambia (26 - 00), fifth seed.
 Although it seemed rather rusty in the match against the "sisters" of the south, South Africa has still improved its performance steadily throughout the tournament.
 They distinguished themselves with disciplined defense, ball handling and excellent teamwork. It was clear that they were the team to beat.
 The tree, according to officials from the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank Museum, is infested with a fungus and poses a public health risk because, they say, it was in imminent danger of falling.
 It was due to be demolished on Tuesday, but was saved by an emergency court ruling.
 The entrances to the caves, called "The Seven Sisters", are all at least 100-250 meters (328-820 feet) in diameter.
 Infrared images show thermal oscillations between day and night, demonstrating that they are probably caves.
 During the day they are colder than the surrounding surface and at night they are warmer.
 Glen Cushing of the astrogeology team at the U.S. Geological Survey (USGS) and Northern Arizona University in Flagstaff, Arizona, said: "Their thermal behavior is not as steady as that of large terrestrial caves, which often maintain a relatively stable temperature, but is consistent with the fact that they are deep holes in the ground."
 In France, voting is traditionally a low-tech experience: voters enter an isolated booth and put a pre-printed ballot in an envelope indicating their chosen candidate.
 After verifying his or her identity by the officials, the voter deposits the envelope in the ballot box and signs the electoral register.
 The French electoral law codifies the procedures in a very strict way.
 Since 1988, the ballot boxes must be transparent so that voters and observers can witness that no ballot boxes are present at the start of the vote and that no other ballot boxes are added to those of the voters, duly counted and authorized.
 Candidates may send their representatives to assist in every phase of the process. In the evening, volunteers count the votes under strict supervision, in accordance with specific procedures.
 ASUS' Eee PC, previously launched worldwide for its low-cost and functional features, has become a controversial topic at the IT Month event in Taipei 2007.
 But the consumer market for laptops will be significantly changed and different after the awarding of the Taiwan Sustainable Award in 2007 to ASUS by the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China.
 The station's website describes the program as "old-fashioned radio theater, with a new and nerdy twist!"
 Initially, the show was only broadcast on the historic online radio site TogiNet Radio, specializing in radio talk shows.
 TogiNet established AstroNet Radio as a sister station at the end of 2015.
 The program originally used non-professional voice actors from East Texas.
 Widespread looting would have continued during the night, given the absence of law enforcement officers on the streets of Bishkek.
 According to one witness, Bishkek was sinking into a state of "anarchy", with gangs of people roaming the streets looting consumer goods.
 Various residents of Bishkek have criticized the southern protesters for illegal actions.
 South Africa won against the All Blacks (New Zealand) in the match of the Tri Nations rugby tournament played at home at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg.
 The final score was 21-20, ending the All Blacks' 15-game winning streak.
 For the Springboks this was the end of a run of five consecutive defeats.
 It was the last game for the All Blacks, who had already won the cup two weeks earlier.
 The final match of the tournament, which will see the Springboks in action against Australia, will take place next week at Ellis Park in Johannesburg.
 A small earthquake struck western Montana on Monday at 10:08 p.m.
 The United States Geological Survey (USGS) and its National Earthquake Information Center have not received any immediate reports of damage.
 The epicenter of the earthquake was located about 20 km (15 miles) north-northeast of Dillon and about 65 km (40 miles) south of Butte.
 The H5N1 strain of avian influenza, which is fatal to humans, has infected a wild duck found dead in eastern France on Monday, in a marsh near Lyon.
 France is the seventh country in the European Union, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy, to be hit by the virus.
 Suspected cases of H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark have not yet been confirmed.
 Chambers had sued God for "sowing death, destruction and terror among millions and millions of inhabitants of the Earth."
 According to Chambers, an agnostic, his legal case is "superficial" and "anyone can be sued by anyone".
 The story presented by Camille Saint-Saens at the French Opera tells of an artist "whose life revolves around the love of drugs and Japan".
 This means that during the show the actors smoke pipes and urge the audience to join them.
 They are, respectively, Newt Gingrich, former speaker of the House, Rick Perry, governor of Texas, and Michele Bachmann, a congresswoman.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum but had harsh words for Romney, for whom negative ads against Gingrich were aired in Iowa.
 Perry said, "I will be back in Texas to see the results of tonight's straw poll and to see if there is a path forward for me in this race"; however, he later said he would stay in the race and would participate in the South Carolina primary on January 21.
 Bachmann, who won the straw poll in Iowa in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was rushed to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 He was about 20 years old. Bieber said, "Even though I was not present nor directly involved in this terrible accident, my thoughts and prayers go out to the victim's family."
 According to the entertainment news website TMZ, the photographer stopped his vehicle on the opposite side of Sepulveda Boulevard and tried to photograph the police officer directing traffic at a stop sign, then crossed the street and continued, forcing the California Highway Patrol officer who was conducting the traffic stop to twice order him to turn around.
 Police said it was unlikely the driver of the car that hit the photographer would face criminal charges.
 With only eighteen medals available each day, a good number of countries failed to make it onto the podium.
 Among these, the Netherlands with Anna Jochemsen placed ninth in the women's Super-G yesterday, and Finland with Katja Saarinen placed tenth in the same classification.
 Australian Mitchell Gourley took the eleventh place in the men's Super-G, while the Czech Oldrich Jelinek took the sixteenth place in the same specialty.
 Mexican Arly Velasquez finished 15th in the men's sitting Super-G. In the men's standing Super-G, New Zealander Adam Hall finished ninth.
 The Polish visually impaired skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished 13th in the Super-G. South Korean Jong Seork Park finished 24th in the men's Super-G.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake are believed to have brought the disease with them, starting it in the soldiers' camp.
 According to the lawsuit, the inadequate sanitation of the United Nations camp's waste led to the bacterial contamination of the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's main waterways.
 Before the troops arrived, Haiti's problems with the disease dated back to the 1800s.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy cited independent studies that claim the disease was inadvertently introduced to Haiti by the United Nations Nepalese peacekeeping force.
 Danielle Lantagne, a United Nations expert on the disease, said the outbreak could have been caused by peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the patient was admitted to Howard University Hospital in stable condition.
 The patient had travelled to Nigeria, where some cases of Ebola virus have been reported.
 The hospital followed the protocol for infection control, including isolating the patient to prevent others from becoming infected.
 Before The Simpsons, Simon had worked on various programs in various roles.
 In the 1980s, he worked on the creation of programs such as Taxi, Cheers and The Tracey Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he participated in the creation of "The Simpsons" ("The Simpsons") along with Brooks and Groening and was responsible for the selection of the first team of scriptwriters of the show.
 He left the show in 1993, but retained the title of executive producer and continued to collect tens of millions of dollars in royalties each season.
 At first the Chinese news agency Xinhua reported that a plane had been hijacked.
 According to reports received later, the plane received a bomb threat and was hijacked, forcing it to return to Afghanistan, where it landed in Kandahar.
 The first reports say that the plane was diverted again to Afghanistan after it was denied emergency landing in Ürümqi.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, whose fleet is now obsolete and poorly maintained, both civilian and military.
 International sanctions meant that they could not buy new aircraft.
 Earlier this week, three people were killed and three others injured in a police helicopter crash.
 Last month Iran experienced its worst air disaster in years when a passenger plane crashed in Armenia, killing all 168 people on board.
 The same month saw another airliner crash off the runway in Mashad and crash into a wall, killing seventeen people.
 The subsequent concerts of the tour were canceled by Aerosmith.
 The sarene rock group was due to start a tour of the United States and Canada that was due to last until September 16.
 It cancelled the tour after lead vocalist Steven Tyler injured himself following a fall from the stage during a performance on August 5.
 Murray lost the first set in a tie-break after the players had held serve in each of the sets.
 Del Potro had an early advantage in the second set, which also ended in a tie-break after the score of 6-6.
 At this point, Del Potro was subjected to a treatment to the shoulder but managed to return to play.
 The start of the program was at 20:30 local (15:00 UTC).
 Some famous singers from all over the country offered bhajan, devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 Singer Sanju Sharma opened the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary. Lakkha Singh, accompanied by singer Raju Khandelwal, also presented the bhajan chhappan bhog.
 Then Lakkha Singh took the initiative and started singing bhajans.
 Baba Shyam was served 108 Chhappan Bhog (for Hindu religion, 56 edible products including sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes, etc. offered to the deity).
 Lakkha Singh also presented the bhajan for the chhappan bhog. He was accompanied by the singer Raju Khandelwal.
 At the presentation of the Tokyo Game Show on Thursday, Satoru Iwata, president of Nintendo, revealed the design of the controller of the new Nintendo Revolution console.
 In a similar way to the TV remote control, two sensors located next to the user's TV triangulate their position in three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements within the game by moving the device in the air.
 Shortly after the start, Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and ended his race.
 Fernando Alonso, his teammate, was in the lead for most of the race, but his race ended right after his pit stop, probably due to the incorrect mounting of the right front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher reached the finish line behind Alonso, due to a suspension problem that occurred during one of the duels in which he was involved during the race.
 According to a transcript of the press conference, he said: "She is very pretty and she sings quite well."
 Every time we did the rehearsals, I felt moved to tears.
 After about 3 minutes after launch, a camera on board showed several pieces of insulating foam falling away from the fuel tank.
 It is not believed, however, that they caused any damage to the shuttle.
 N. Wayne Hale Jr., NASA's Space Shuttle Program manager, said the foam fell after the time that was of concern to them.
 Five minutes after the start of the show, the wind starts, about a minute later, the wind is reaching 70 km / h... then the rain comes, so violent and torrential as to prick your skin like a needle, then the hail starts, people in a panic, screaming and running, overturning.
 "I lost my sister and her friend, while I was moving I had in front of me two disabled people in wheelchairs and people who were jumping on them and pushing them," Armand Versace said.
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant, which is located in Niigata Prefecture, was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported no damage from the quake; it also said that reactors 1 and 2 at the Shika nuclear power plant were shut down.
 According to the report, about 9,400 homes in the area are without water and about 100 without electricity.
 Some roads are damaged, the railway network is interrupted in the affected areas and Noto airport in Ishikawa prefecture remains closed.
 A bomb exploded outside the office of the governor general.
 Within two hours, three more bombs exploded near government buildings.
 According to some reports, the official death toll is eight and official reports confirm that there were up to 30 injured, although the final numbers are not yet known.
 In the samples of deceased domestic urine after eating contaminated pet food, traces of both cyanuric acid and melamine were found.
 The researchers at the university said the two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can interfere with kidney function.
 Researchers found in the urine of cats the formation of crystals, due to the addition of melamine and cyanuric acid.
 By comparison using infrared spectroscopy (FT-IR), the composition of these crystals corresponds to that found in the urine of pets that are affected.
 I don't know if you realize it or not, but a large part of the goods coming from Central America has entered our country duty-free.
 Nevertheless, 80% of our goods have been taxed with duties in the Central American countries.
 It all seemed to me to be nonsense; it was certainly not right.
 All I say to people is treat us like we treat you.
 California Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a law banning the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 The bill would require violent video games to be labeled with a "18" rating and make it a misdemeanor to sell them to minors, punishable by a $1,000 fine.
 This morning the chief prosecutor, Kier Starmer QC, issued a statement saying that both Huhne and Pryce will be charged.
 Huhne has resigned and will be replaced in government by Ed Davey MP. Norman Lamb MP is expected to take over the role of Minister for Business left vacant by Davey.
 The appearance of Huhne and Pryce at the Westminster Magistrates' Court is scheduled for February 16.
 The victims were Nicholas Alden, 25, and the driver, Zachary Cuddeback, 21.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered injuries to his arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider will undergo surgery to reconstruct his face.
 Uka's gun did not explode when it was pointed at the head of a fifth man. Schneider has constant pain, is blind in one eye, has a section of his skull missing and his face has been reconstructed in titanium.
 Schneider testified via videoconference from a USAF base in his country.
 In addition to the Wednesday event, Carpanedo competed in two single races at the Championships.
 The first in the slalom, where at the first descent he recorded a DNF. Another 36 competitors out of 116 in the same race did not complete the test.
 The other race she participated in, the giant slalom, she finished tenth in the women's sitting category with a combined time of 4:41.30, more than 2:11.60 minutes behind the first-place finisher, Austrian Claudia Loesch, and more than 1:09.02 minutes behind Hungarian Gyöngyi Dani, who finished ninth.
 Four women in the women's group failed to finish their runs, and 45 of the 117 participants in the Giant Slalom did not finish the race.
 The Madhya Pradesh police managed to recover the laptop and the cell phone that had been stolen.
 Deputy Inspector General DK Arya said: "Five people have been arrested for raping the Swiss woman. We have also recovered her mobile phone and laptop."
 The names of the accused are: Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 According to the superintendent of police Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the accused appeared in court with their faces covered.
 None of the three people who were in the house at the time of the car crash was injured.
 Nevertheless, the driver was seriously injured in the head.
 The road on which the accident occurred was temporarily closed, while the rescue services freed the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was initially admitted to the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Since then, Adekoya has been in the custody of the Edinburgh Sheriff Court on charges of killing his own son.
 She is being held in custody pending trial and sentencing, but any testimony from an eyewitness could be tainted, as her image has been widely published.
 This is common practice in other parts of the UK, but Scottish justice has different parameters. Scottish courts have ruled that publishing the photos could be prejudicial.
 According to Pamela Ferguson, a professor at the University of Dundee, "journalists who publish photos or other information about suspects are walking on a minefield."
 The Crown Office, which has overall responsibility for prosecutions, said it would not be making any further comment until the formal charge was made.
 The document is expected to address the dispute over borders, which Palestinians want to be based on the pre-1967 lines.
 The other topics reportedly include the future status of Jerusalem, which is holy to both nations, and the issue of the Jordan Valley.
 Once the agreement is signed, Israel demands a permanent military presence in the valley, while the Palestinian Authority agrees to abandon such presence only for five years.
 Shooters in the experimental program for the control of pests had to be carefully supervised by rangers, since the experiment was monitored and its effectiveness evaluated.
 As part of the hunting program of the Sporting Shooters Association, the NPWS in collaboration with the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia (NSW) Inc., has recruited qualified volunteers.
 According to Mick O'Flynn, acting director of the Park Conservation and Heritage of the NPWS, the four shooters chosen for the first shooting operation received extensive training and safety instructions.
 Yesterday Martelly swore in a new Provisional Electoral Council (CEP) composed of nine members.
 This is the fifth provisional electoral council of Martelly in four years.
 Last month a presidential commission proposed a package of measures aimed at pushing the country towards new elections, including the resignation of the previous CEP.
 The commission was Martelly's response to widespread protests, which began in October, that challenged the regime.
 Occasional violent protests have been sparked by the failure to hold elections, some of which were scheduled as early as 2011.
 About 60 cases of malfunctioning iPods overheating have been reported, resulting in a total of six fires and causing minor burns to four people.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it was aware of 27 incidents involving the devices.
 Last week, the Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) announced that it had been informed by Apple of another 34 incidents related to overheating, which the company defined as "not serious".
 In its response, the ministry called Apple's decision to delay the report "absolutely deplorable."
 The earthquake in the Marianas was felt at 07:19 local time (21:19 GMT on Friday).
 According to the Northern Mariana Islands Emergency Management Office, no damage was reported in the nation.
 And also the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center reported that there were no signs of a tsunami in progress.
 In Manila, the capital of the Philippines, a former Filipino policeman took hostage Hong Kong tourists after hijacking their bus.
 With his M16 rifle Rolando Mendoza fired at the tourists.
 Many of the hostages were rescued, at least six died.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were freed immediately along with the Filipino photographers.
 The photographers then replaced an elderly woman who needed to use the bathroom. Mendoza was shot dead.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and became a doctor.
 After training as an obstetrician, she joined the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 While serving at the hospital, in his spare time Liggins began to study cases of premature labor.
 His research showed that the administration of a hormone accelerated lung maturation in the fetus.
 Xinhua reported that government investigators on Wednesday recovered two "black boxes" with flight recordings.
 Even his fellow wrestlers wanted to pay tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer said: "Luna was the first Queen of the Extreme. My first manager. She died on the night of the two moons. Alone, just like her. A strong woman."
 "Luna was as weird as me... maybe even weirder... I love her and I'm going to miss her... Hopefully she's in a better place," Dustin "Goldust" Runnels said.
 According to a survey of 1,400 people before the 2010 federal election, those opposed to Australia becoming a republic increased by 8% from 2008.
 During the 2010 federal election campaign, the then-acting Prime Minister, Julia Gillard, stated that she believed Australia should become a republic at the end of Elizabeth II's reign.
 This view is shared by 34% of respondents, according to whom Queen Elizabeth II should be the last monarch of Australia.
 At the opposite end of the survey, 29% of respondents said Australia should become a republic as soon as possible, while 31% said it should never become one.
 The Olympic gold medallist was due to compete in the 100 and 200m freestyle and three relay events at the Commonwealth Games, but has suffered a number of ailments which have led to doubts over her fitness.
 He was unable to take the painkillers he needed to get through the Games because they are banned.
 On January 25, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at Central Missouri University, discovered the largest prime number ever known to date.
 The discovery was verified by several people using various hardware and software in early February, and was announced Tuesday.
 Comets may have been one of the sources that brought water and organic matter, the stuff of life, to Earth.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form and in particular how the Earth formed when it collided with a comet long ago.
 Cuomo, 53, has been in office since the beginning of this year as governor; last month he signed a law legalizing same-sex marriage.
 In his view, speculation is nothing but "political chatter and nonsense".
 He is expected to run for president in 2016.
 According to the FAA, NextGen would allow planes to fly shorter routes and save millions of gallons of fuel a year, reducing carbon dioxide emissions.
 The system uses satellite technology rather than the outdated ground-based radar, to allow air traffic controllers to locate aircraft more precisely and provide pilots with more accurate information.
 No additional transport is being laid on and surface trains will not stop at Wembley, while there is no car parking or interchange parking available on site.
 Fears over the lack of transportation options have raised the possibility of the game being played behind closed doors, without the support of the team's fans.
 According to a study published Thursday in the journal Science, a new species of bird has been born on the Galapagos Islands in Ecuador.
 According to researchers from Princeton University, United States, and Uppsala University, Sweden, the new species evolved in just two generations, although it was believed that the time required for this process was much longer; this is due to the mating between a Darwin's endemic finch, Geospiza fortes, and the immigrant cactus finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can be worked into any shape. It can be rolled into tiny shapes.
 It can be pulled to form a thin thread, suitable for being twisted and intertwined. It can be hammered or rolled into sheets.
 It can be made very thin and attached to other metals. Sometimes it was used to decorate hand-painted images in books called "illuminated manuscripts" precisely because of its ability to be made so thin.
 This is the so-called pH of the substance. Using the juice of red cabbage it is possible to build a pH indicator.
 The juice of the cabbage changes color depending on how acidic or basic (alkaline) the chemical element is.
 The pH level of the chemical analyzed is given by the amount of hydrogen ions present (the letter H of pH).
 Hydrogen ions are protons from which electrons have been stripped (since hydrogen atoms are made up of a proton and an electron).
 Mix the two dried powders together and then, with clean and wet hands, roll them into a ball.
 Between the moisture on your hands and the outer layers, a reaction will occur that will cause a strange sensation and form a kind of shell.
 Almost all the houses in the cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had a bathroom with running water connected to an advanced sewage system.
 In Greece, in the houses of the Minoan cities of Crete and Santorini, remains of sewage systems have been discovered.
 Toilets in ancient times also existed in Egypt, Persia and China. In Roman civilization they were sometimes included in public baths, frequented by a mixed public of men and women.
 To call someone far away thousands of miles, a satellite is used.
 The satellite in space receives the signal and then sends it back almost instantaneously.
 The satellite was launched into space with a rocket. Scientists use space telescopes because the Earth's atmosphere distorts some of the light and the view.
 To get a satellite or a telescope into space, a rocket must be more than 100 feet tall.
 The wheel has changed the world in many ways. Among the many benefits it has given us, the most important is that it has provided us with easier and faster transportation.
 Thanks to his invention, the train, the automobile and several other means of transportation came into being.
 Below them are other medium-sized felines that feed on medium-sized prey, ranging from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, there are many small felines (including feral domestic cats) that feed on small prey, notably more numerous, such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The concept of niche is the secret of their success, a particular goal that each feline has and that allows them not to compete with others.
 Lions are the most social of the felines and live in large groups called prides.
 The herds are composed of adult males, usually 2 or 3 related, and a number of females and cubs that can reach 30.
 Usually the females are closely related to each other, being a large family of daughters and sisters.
 The lion pack behaves in a way very similar to the wolf or dog pack, whose behavior is in fact surprisingly similar to that of lions (but not to that of other big cats), even as far as the deadly attacks on their prey.
 A complete athlete: the tiger is able to climb (albeit not very well), swim, jump very long distances and exert a pulling force five times greater than that of a strong man.
 The tiger belongs to the same family (the genus Panthera) as the lion, the leopard and the jaguar. These four felines are the only ones to roar.
 The roar of the tiger is not as powerful as that of the lion, but it is more like a sentence of shouted and angry words.
 Ocelots love to eat small animals. If possible, they hunt monkeys, snakes, rodents and birds and almost all the prey they catch is much smaller than they are.
 Scientists believe that skunks follow and find animals to eat (prey) thanks to their sense of smell, sniffing the ground where they have been.
 Thanks to their night vision, they can see very well in the dark, and they can also move stealthily. To hunt their prey, they camouflage themselves with the surrounding environment and then pounce on them.
 When a small group of living beings (a small population) separates from the main population to which it belongs (for example, if it moves beyond a mountain range or a river, or if it moves to a new island, making a return difficult), it will probably find itself in an environment different from the one in which it was before.
 This new environment is characterized by different resources and competitors, so, to position itself as a strong competitor, the new population will need different characteristics or transformations than those needed previously.
 The original population has not changed at all; it continues to need the same adaptations as before.
 As time passes and the new population adapts to its new environment, it looks less and less like the other population.
 At some point, after thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will appear so different from each other that they can no longer be defined as belonging to the same species.
 This process, which involves the formation of new species, is called speciation. Speciation is an inevitable consequence and is a fundamental element of evolution.
 Plants produce the oxygen that humans breathe and absorb the carbon dioxide that humans exhale.
 Plants make their own food with the sun through photosynthesis. They also shade.
 We build our houses from plants and make our clothes from plants. Most of the food we eat comes from plants. Without plants, animals could not survive.
 The mosasaur was the superpredator of its era and for this it feared nothing, except other mosasaurs.
 From its long jaws protruded more than 70 razor-sharp teeth, plus an additional row on the palate, so that anyone who crossed its path was doomed.
 We don't know for sure, but it is possible that it had a forked tongue. Its diet included turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and it may have been a cannibal.
 He also attacked anything that went into the water; even a giant dinosaur like the T-Rex couldn't have competed with him.
 While most of their food would be familiar to us, Roman banquets also included some strange or unusual dishes, such as wild boar, peacock, snails, and a rodent called a porcupine.
 Another difference was that while the poor and women ate sitting on chairs, the rich men liked to feast together lying on their sides while eating their meal.
 Of course, the food of the ancient Romans did not include many foods that would arrive in Europe from America or Asia centuries later.
 For example, they had no maize, tomatoes, potatoes or cocoa, and none of the ancient Romans had ever tasted turkey.
 The Babylonians built a main temple for each god, which was considered the god's home.
 People made sacrifices to the gods and priests tried to provide for the needs of the deities through ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard and then an inner sanctuary accessible only to priests.
 Sometimes, special pyramid-shaped towers, called ziggurats, were built as part of the temples.
 The top of the tower was a sanctuary dedicated to the god.
 Thanks to the mild climate of the Middle East, the house was not of fundamental importance.
 Much of the Jewish family life took place outdoors.
 Women cooked in the courtyard, while the shops were simple outdoor stalls that faced the street. Stone was used to build houses.
 There were no large forests in the land of Canaan, so wood was very expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely populated. In the Norse sagas it is said that Erik the Red gave the name to Greenland after he encountered it on his voyage after being exiled from Iceland for murder.
 But, regardless of its discovery, at that time the Eskimo tribes already lived there.
 Although all of these countries are "Scandinavian", the peoples, kings, customs and history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway and Iceland were very different.
 If you have seen the movie "The Da Vinci Code", you might think that the back of the Declaration of Independence is a map to the treasure.
 However, this is false. Even though there is something written on the back of the document, it is not a treasure map.
 On the back of the Declaration of Independence is the inscription "Original Declaration of Independence July 4, 1776." The text appears upside down at the bottom of the document.
 Although it is not known for certain who wrote it, it is known that at the beginning of its existence the large parchment document (measuring 29.75 inches by 24.5 inches) was rolled up to be stored.
 Probably, therefore, the annotation was only put as a label.
 The D-Day landings and the ensuing fighting had brought northern France to liberation, but the south was still occupied.
 It was ruled by the Vichy regime, that is, by those French who in 1940 had made peace with the Germans and allied themselves with the invaders, instead of fighting them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded southern France: this offensive was called "Operation Dragoon".
 American and Free French forces had liberated southern France in just two weeks and were heading for Germany.
 Civilization is a specific culture, shared by a significantly large group of people who live and work in a collaborative manner, forming a society.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin "civilis", which means civil; the term is in turn linked to "civis", that is citizen, and "civitas", that is city or city-state, and in some way defines the dimensions of society.
 The city-states are the first realities to anticipate the idea of nation. Culture of the civilization means to transmit knowledge through several generations, to leave an indelible cultural imprint through an equitable diffusion.
 Minor cultures often disappear without leaving any significant historical traces, and are thus not recognized as true civilizations.
 During the War of Independence, the thirteen states formed a weak central government for the first time, and the Congress was its only component, according to the Articles of Confederation.
 The Congress had no power to impose taxes and, given the absence of an executive or judicial power at the national level, relied on the state authorities, often uncooperative, to enforce its acts.
 He did not even have the authority to bypass tax laws and tariffs between states.
 To change the articles required the unanimous consent of all the states, which in turn had so little regard for the central government that their representatives were often absent.
 The Italian national football team is the second most successful national football team in the world, and won the 2006 FIFA World Cup.
 Among the most popular sports are: football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula One motor racing.
 Winter sports are more popular in the northern regions and see Italians competing in international competitions and Olympic events.
 Japan is made up of almost 7,000 islands (the largest is Honshu), making it the seventh largest archipelago in the world!
 From a geographical point of view, Japan is referred to as an "archipelago", considering the presence of groups of islands that make it up.
 Taiwan was born in the 15th century, when European sailors who passed by soon recorded the name of the island with the name of Ilha Formosa, or wonderful island.
 The Dutch East India Company in 1624 established a base in the southwest of Taiwan, initiating a transformation of the aboriginal rice-growing systems and bringing in Chinese labourers to work in its sugar and rice plantations.
 In 1683, the western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan came under the control of the Qing dynasty (1644-1912); in 1885, Taiwan was declared a province of the Qing Empire.
 After being defeated in the First Sino-Japanese War (1894-1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki in 1895, ceding sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan; the island remained under Japanese rule until 1945.
 Machu Picchu comprises three primary structures, and notably the Intihuatana, The Temple of the Sun and the Temple of the Three Windows.
 Much of the peripheral buildings have been rebuilt to give tourists a more accurate idea of their original appearance.
 In 1976, 30% of the Machu Picchu site had been recovered, but restoration work is still ongoing.
 The most common format in the world for still photography, for example, is 35 mm, the same as the most used film at the end of the analogue photography era.
 It is still produced today and, more importantly, its aspect ratio is inherited from the image sensor sizes of digital cameras.
 Strangely, the height of the 35 mm format is 24 mm and its width is 36 mm.
 The proportions of this format (dividing by twelve to get the simplest ratio of whole numbers) are therefore considered 3:2.
 The proportions of many of the formed shapes (for example the APS family of shapes) are equal to or very close to this value.
 The much-abused and often derided rule of thirds is a simple guideline that creates dynamism while maintaining a measure of order within an image.
 According to this rule, the most effective place to position the main subject is at the intersection of the lines that divide the image into thirds, both vertically and horizontally (as in the example).
 At this stage in European history, the Catholic Church, having become rich and powerful, found itself under scrutiny.
 Christianity had been the glue that held the European states together for over a thousand years, despite their linguistic and cultural differences.
 His omnipresent power influenced everyone from the king to the commoners.
 One of the foundations of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that the church's monetary reserves exist for this very reason.
 The central authority of the church remained in Rome for over a thousand years and this convergence of power and money has led many to question whether this principle was respected.
 Shortly after the outbreak of hostilities, Britain decided to implement a naval blockade against Germany.
 The strategy proved effective: it involved the interruption of any essential military and civilian supply, despite this blockade violating international law, which has been generally accepted and codified by multiple international treaties over the last two centuries.
 Britain mined international waters to prevent access to whole sections of the ocean, putting even neutral ships at risk.
 As this tactic had met with a limited response, Germany expected a similar reaction to its indiscriminate U-boat warfare campaign.
 In the 1920s, the prevailing attitudes of most citizens and nations were pacifism and isolationism.
 After witnessing the horrors and atrocities of the First World War, nations wanted to avoid a similar situation in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla accepted a job offer from the Edison Company in New York City and this led him to move to the United States of America.
 He arrived in the United States with 4 cents in his pocket, a book of poetry, and a letter of recommendation written by Charles Batchelor (his boss at his previous job) and addressed to Thomas Edison.
 In ancient China, the different periods of time were indicated in a very singular way: each period of China or each family that was in power constituted a specific dynasty.
 The intervals between the individual dynasties were also characterized by periods of instability and division between the provinces. The most well-known was the so-called Three Kingdoms period, between the Han dynasty and the Jin dynasty, which lasted for 60 years.
 In these periods, many nobles fought for the throne, and fierce wars broke out.
 The Three Kingdoms period was one of the most violent eras in ancient China, with thousands of people dying in the struggle to gain a place of honor in the imposing palace of Xi'an.
 The social and political effects are numerous, among these we can mention the use of the metric system, the transition from absolutism to the republic, nationalism and the conviction that the nation belongs to the people and is not the property of a single sovereign.
 In addition, after the Revolution, professions were open to all male candidates, allowing the most ambitious and fortunate to succeed.
 The same is true for the military, since the army’s rankings, instead of being based on class, are now based on caliber.
 The French Revolution was a source of inspiration for many other oppressed workers in various countries to start their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was deeply interested in issues that went beyond this life. He used to go to a cave known as "Hira" on the mountain of "noor" (light) to meditate.
 The cave, which has survived the passage of time, offers in itself a very clear image of the spirituality of Muhammad.
 The cave is located on the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca, completely detached from the rest of the world.
 It is not easy to find, even if you know it exists, and once inside the cave, the isolation is total.
 You can see nothing but a beautiful clear sky and a lot of mountains around. From inside the cave you can see or hear very little of the outside world.
 Among the seven wonders of the world, the Great Pyramid of Giza is the only one that has survived to the present day.
 Built by the Egyptians in the third century BC, the Great Pyramid is one of the great pyramid structures built in honor of the dead pharaoh.
 The Giza plain, or "Giza Necropolis", in the Valley of the Kings in Egypt, is home to numerous pyramids (the largest of which is the Pyramid of Cheops), several smaller tombs, several temples and the Great Sphinx.
 The important pyramid was built in honor of Pharaoh Cheops, and many of the smaller pyramids, tombs and temples were built to honor the pharaoh's wives and family members.
 The "upward arch" sign looks like a V, and the "downward arch" sign looks like a staple or a square with a missing bottom.
 Up means that you should start from the tip and push the bow, and down means that you should start from the alamaro (which is where the hand holds the bow) and pull the bow towards yourself.
 An up bow usually produces a softer sound, while a down bow produces a stronger, more decisive sound.
 You can decide to add your own personalized indications with a pencil, but keep in mind that the archeggio signs you find printed have a musical value, so in general they should be respected.
 On October 6, 1789, a crowd of women from the market forced King Louis XVI, in a state of terror, to leave Versailles and return to Paris, along with Queen Marie Antoinette, their two young sons (Marie Thérèse, 11, and Louis Charles, 4), and King Louis XVI's sister, Elisabeth.
 With a carriage they returned to Paris, surrounded by a crowd of people who shouted and screamed threats against the sovereigns.
 The crowd forced the king and queen to keep their carriage windows open.
 At some point, someone in the crowd showed the terrified queen the head of a royal guard who had been killed at Versailles.
 The war expenses of US imperialism to conquer the Philippines were paid by the Filipinos themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the US colonial regime to cover a large part of the expenses and the interest on the bonds fluctuated in the name of the Philippine government through the Wall Street banks.
 Clearly the huge profits derived from the long-term exploitation of the Filipino people were the profits that underpinned US imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, we must know the context that led to the creation of this order.
 The time period in which the events took place is commonly called the High Middle Ages, the period of European history that covers the 11th, 12th and 13th centuries (from 1000 to 1300 AD).
 The High Middle Ages was preceded by the Early Middle Ages and followed by the Late Middle Ages, which ended around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term that includes in practice a wide range of ideas, from technological innovation or technological imperative to the narrow sense according to which the fate of man is moved by an underlying logic, associated with scientific laws and their realization in technology.
 Most interpretations of technological determinism share two general ideas: one is that the development of technology itself follows a path that goes well beyond political and cultural influence, and the other is that technology has in turn "effects" on societies that are intrinsic, rather than socially conditioned.
 For example, we can say that the automobile necessarily involves the development of the road network.
 However, a national road network for only a few cars is not economically sustainable, so new production methods are being developed to reduce the costs associated with owning a car.
 The mass ownership of automobiles also leads to a higher percentage of accidents on the roads, and consequently the invention of new techniques of first aid for the care of injured people.
 Romanticism was characterized by a strong component of cultural determinism, drawn from authors such as Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 In the context of romanticism, geography has conditioned individuals, and over time, customs, habits and culture have arisen linked to this geography that, being in harmony with the context of society, have proved more effective than laws imposed arbitrarily.
 Like Paris, nowadays known as the capital of contemporary fashion, Constantinople was the capital of fashion in feudal Europe.
 Its reputation as a centre of luxury began around 400 AD and continued until about 1100 AD.
 During the twelfth century its prestige declined, mainly because the crusaders returned bringing gifts such as silk and spices, which were valued more than what the Byzantine markets offered.
 It was at this point that the title of fashion capital passed from Constantinople to Paris.
 The highest point of the Gothic style was reached in the period between the 10th and 11th centuries and in the 14th century.
 Initially, clothing was strongly influenced by the Byzantine culture of the east.
 But the slowness of the communication routes means that the diffusion of styles in the West can be delayed by 25-30 years.
 Towards the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style. One of the most significant developments of the time, as a result of the Crusades, was the introduction of buttons to fasten clothing.
 Subsistence agriculture is defined as agriculture practiced for the sole purpose of producing enough food to meet the needs of the farmer and his or her family.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple system, usually organic, that uses indigenous seeds from the ecological region in association with crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques aimed at maximizing harvests.
 Historically, most farmers practiced subsistence agriculture, and in many developing countries it still is.
 Subcultures unite individuals with similar opinions who do not feel represented by the standards of society, allowing them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures are distinguished by age, ethnicity, social class, location and/or gender of its members.
 The characteristics that define a subculture can be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of factors.
 Often members of a subculture indicate their membership through a distinctive and symbolic use of style, which includes fashion, mannerisms, and slang.
 One of the most commonly used methods of explaining the importance of socialization is to analyze some unfortunate cases of children who, through neglect, misfortune, or the effect of intentional abuse, have grown up without proper socialization with adults.
 These children are called "feral" or wild. Some of them have been segregated by people (often their own parents): in some cases the abandonment is motivated by the refusal of a serious intellectual or physical handicap by the parents.
 Feral children may have suffered severe abuse or trauma before being abandoned or running away.
 Other children may have been raised by animals; still others seem to have lived alone in the wild.
 When a feral child is fully raised by nonhuman animals, it shows behaviors (within physical limits) almost entirely analogous to those of the particular animal that took care of it, such as fear or indifference towards humans.
 Project-based learning should make learning itself easier and more interesting, while scaffolding goes a bit further.
 Scaffolding is not a learning mode, but rather a support for those who are undertaking a new learning experience, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 Scaffolding can be both virtual and real. In other words, a teacher is an example of "scaffolding", but so is the little wedge-shaped assistant in Microsoft Office.
 The virtual scaffolds are integrated into the software and are designed to query, prompt and explain procedures that the student may have struggled with on their own.
 Children are given up for adoption for various reasons ranging from abandonment to abuse, not to mention extortion.
 A child should never grow up in an environment that does not guarantee nutrition, care and training, but they do.
 We believe that fostering is a safe place for these children.
 Our foster care system should provide safe homes, loving foster parents, stable education and reliable health care.
 It is assumed that fostering will make up for all the needs not met in the home from which they were taken.
 The Internet combines some elements of both mass communication and interpersonal communication.
 The characteristic elements of the Internet lead to additional dimensions in terms of the theory of uses and gratifications.
 For example, as important motivations for the use of Internet are suggested "learning" and "socialization" (James et al., 1995).
 Eighmey and McCord's (1998) study of audience reactions to web sites identified two new aspects of motivation, "personal involvement" and "continuous relationships."
 The use of video recording has allowed to reach significant discoveries in the interpretation of micro-expressions, which are facial movements lasting a few milliseconds.
 Specifically, it is claimed that it is possible to discover whether a person is lying by correctly interpreting micro-expressions.
 In his essay "The President's Speech", Oliver Sacks illustrated how people who are unable to understand spoken language due to brain damage are nevertheless able to assess sincerity with precision.
 He even claims that such abilities in interpreting human behavior can be shared with animals, such as domestic dogs.
 In the 20th century, research has demonstrated the existence of two pools of genetic variability, namely hidden and expressed variability.
 With mutation, new genetic variability is added, with selection, it is eliminated from the pool of variability expressed.
 Generation after generation, segregation and recombination redistribute the variability back and forth between the two pools.
 For a primate with a digestive system similar to that of humans, it is difficult to meet amino acid requirements with the plant resources available in the savannah.
 Moreover, the failure to carry out such activities has serious consequences: slow growth, malnutrition and, in the end, even death.
 The most easily accessible plant resources would have been the proteins in leaves and legumes, but for primates like us they are difficult to digest unless cooked.
 Animal foods (such as ants, termites, and eggs) are not only easy to digest, but they provide a high amount of protein, containing all the essential amino acids.
 In light of all this, it should come as no surprise that our own ancestors solved their “protein problem” in a certain sense just as savanna chimpanzees do today.
 Sleep interruption is the intentional process of waking during the normal sleep period, followed by a return to sleep (10–60 minutes later).
 This process can be easily put into practice using a relatively quiet alarm clock to bring you to a state of consciousness, without fully waking you up.
 If you decide to reset the clock in your sleep, you can put it on the other side of the room, so you will be forced to get up from bed to turn it off.
 Other options focused on the biorhythm include the consumption of many liquids before bed (especially water or tea, known for its diuretic properties), which forces you to get up to urinate.
 A person enjoys an inner peace in proportion to the tension existing in his body and spirit.
 The less tension, the more positive the vital force that exists. Each of us has the potential to find absolute peace and fulfillment.
 Everyone can reach enlightenment. This goal is only hindered by our tension and negativity.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been enriched by the path of love of the Mahayana rite and by various techniques of Indian yoga.
 In general, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple. It is based on Kundalini Yoga, meditation and a path of all-embracing love.
 Kundalini Yoga activates the Kundalini energy (energy of enlightenment) through the use of yoga postures, breathing exercises, mantras and visualizations.
 Deity Yoga is the core of Tibetan meditation. Through the visualization of various deities, the energy channels are cleansed, the chakras are activated and the consciousness of enlightenment is developed.
 Germany was a common enemy in World War II, leading to the collaboration between the USSR and the United States. With the end of the war, systemic, procedural and cultural conflicts led to the breakup between the two countries.
 Two years after the end of the war, the allies of the past had become enemies; the Cold War had begun.
 It would have lasted for the next 40 years and would have been fought for real, by mercenary armies, on battlefields from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, Cuba and many other countries.
 On 17 September 1939, the Polish defence had already been broken; the only option was to retreat and reorganise along the Romanian bridgehead.
 These plans proved to be obsolete, however, when more than 800,000 Soviet Red Army soldiers advanced and created the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts, after invading the eastern regions of Poland, violating the Riga Peace Treaty, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other international, bilateral, and multilateral treaties.
 Using ships to transport goods is certainly the most efficient way to move large volumes of people and goods across the oceans.
 The task of the Navy has always been to ensure the country's ability to move people and goods, while countering the ability of enemies to move their people and goods.
 One of the more recent examples in support of this theory and most notably is the Battle of the Atlantic during World War II. During the battle, the Americans were trying to move men and goods across the Atlantic Ocean to support Britain.
 At the same time, the German navy, using mainly submarines, tried to disrupt this traffic.
 If the Allies had not succeeded, Germany would probably have been able to conquer Britain, as it had done in the rest of Europe.
 Goats were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros Mountains of Iran.
 They were first domesticated by ancient cultures and tribes for their milk, wool, meat, and hides.
 Domestic goats were usually kept in herds that were allowed to roam the hills or other grazing areas, often tended by herdsmen (similar to shepherds) who were often children or adolescents. These methods of herding are still used today.
 As early as the 16th century, wagonways were built in England.
 Although they were simply made of parallel wooden planks, the wagonways, compared to the slightly more bumpy roads of the time, allowed the horses that travelled on them to reach greater speeds and to move heavier loads.
 The sleepers were introduced relatively early to keep the rails in position. Gradually, however, it was realized that the rails would be more efficient if they had a bar of iron on top.
 It became a common practice, although the iron caused greater wear and tear of the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 Finally, wooden wheels gave way to iron ones. In 1767, the first completely iron rails appeared.
 The first means of transportation that mankind has known are the legs. Humans began to walk upright two million years ago with the appearance of Homo Erectus (which means "upright man").
 His predecessor, the australopithecine, did not habitually walk upright.
 Signs of bipedal locomotion are present in Australopithecus fossils dating to 4.2-3.9 million years ago, although it is possible that Sahelanthropus was already walking on two legs seven million years ago.
 To try to mitigate in some way the future sufferings we can start to adopt lifestyles more respectful of the environment, we can join the environmental movement and also do activism.
 In many cases this only works as a symptomatic treatment. If we want a permanent solution, we should find the root cause of the problems and eliminate it.
 It is quite obvious that the world has changed a lot because of the scientific and technological progress of humanity, while the problems have increased because of the overpopulation and extravagant lifestyle of human beings.
 After the Congress adopted it on July 4, a handwritten draft signed by the President of the Congress, John Hancock, and the Secretary, Charles Thomson, was then sent to the printing shop of John Dunlap a few blocks away.
 Between 150 and 200 copies were produced that night, now known as the "Dunlap Broadside".
 The document was read publicly for the first time on July 8 in Independence Hall's courtyard and the job was entrusted to John Nixon.
 One was sent to George Washington on July 6, which he read to his troops in New York on July 9, while a copy reached London on August 10.
 The 25 Dunlap broadsides that are still known are the oldest extant copies of the document; the original manuscript is lost.
 According to many paleontologists today, a category of dinosaurs survived and is still alive. They are the ones we call birds.
 Many tend to not consider them dinosaurs because of their feathers and their ability to fly.
 Yet birds have many features that link them to dinosaurs.
 Like the T-Rex, they have feet with claws and scales, lay eggs, and walk on their hind legs.
 Ultimately, the manipulation of information encoded in the form of binary numbers is the basis of all computers currently in use.
 A binary number can only have one of two values, either 0 or 1, and in computer science these numbers are called binary digits or bits.
 Internal poisoning may not be immediately obvious. Its symptoms, including vomiting, are very generic, making it impossible to make an immediate diagnosis.
 The main indication of internal poisoning could be the presence in the house of an open container of drugs or harmful chemicals.
 Check the label for first aid instructions for that specific poison.
 The term mite is used formally by entomologists for this group of insects.
 The term comes from the familiarity in ancient times with bed bugs, insects that have adapted strongly to become parasites of man.
 Both the assassin and bed bugs are nidicolous, meaning they are adapted to live in the nest or home of their host.
 In the United States of America, multiple sclerosis (MS) affects about 400,000 people, making it the most common neurological disease affecting young and middle-aged adults.
 MS is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which includes the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 The research found that the likelihood of developing MS in females is double that of males.
 A couple may decide that raising a child is not in their best interest, or in the best interest of their child.
 These couples have the option of choosing an adoption plan for their child.
 In adoption, the natural parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 The primary goal of science is to understand how the world works through the scientific method. This method guides most scientific inquiry.
 But it is not only experimentation, since an experiment is a test that is used to exclude one or more of the possible hypotheses; asking questions and making observations also allows to orient the scientific research.
 Naturalists and philosophers focused on classical texts, especially the Latin version of the Bible.
 The opinions of Aristotle on various subjects of knowledge, including psychology, were accepted.
 With the progressive decline of the Greek language, the West was isolated from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Many have observed that physiological rhythms and behavior are determined by the presence of endogenous cycles and their production through biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms have been documented, which are not just reactions to external periodic signals, as in most living beings, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals.
 Biological clocks are independent oscillators, whose free cycle continues for a period of time even in the absence of external stimuli.
 One of the first experiments to suggest that DNA was a genetic material was that conducted by Hershey and Chase.
 Hershey and Chase used bacteriophages, or viruses, to implant their own DNA into a bacterium.
 They performed two experiments highlighting the DNA of the bacteriophage with radioactive phosphorus or the protein of the bacteriophage with radioactive sulfur.
 Mutations can have a range of different effects depending on the type of mutation, the significance of the piece of genetic material involved and whether the cells affected belong to the germ line.
 The mutations that can be passed on to children are only those at the level of the germ cells; mutations elsewhere can cause cell death or cancer.
 Nature tourism attracts people interested in visiting natural areas for the purpose of enjoying the landscape, including flora and fauna.
 Examples of activities to do on site include hunting, fishing, photography, birdwatching, park visits and ecosystem information studies.
 For example by visiting, photographing and learning about the Bornean orangutans.
 Every morning, people leave the small rural towns to drive to work, passing other people whose workplace is the place they have just left.
 In this dynamic back and forth, everyone is somehow connected to a system of transport based on private cars, which at the same time support.
 Today science reveals that this massive carbon-based economy has forced the biosphere outside of one of its stability conditions that has allowed human evolution for the last two million years.
 Every person participates in social life and uses transport systems, which almost everyone complains about.
 In developed countries, it is rare to hear such complaints about water quality or crumbling bridges.
 Why do transportation systems attract so many complaints, why are they failing every day? Are the engineers who design them incompetent, or are there deeper motivations?
 Traffic flow is the study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles from one point to another and the interactions they generate with each other.
 Unfortunately, the study of traffic flow is complex because the behavior of drivers cannot be predicted with absolute certainty.
 Fortunately, the behavior of drivers tends to fall within a reasonably constant range, so in turn, traffic flows tend to show a reasonable consistency and can be represented mathematically in a generic way.
 To obtain a more accurate representation of the traffic flow, the three main variables were correlated: (1) flow, (2) density and (3) speed.
 These relationships are useful for planning, designing and managing road structures.
 Insects were the first animals to fly. The ability to fly allowed them to escape enemies more easily and to find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects are benefited by the ability to fold their wings along their bodies.
 This allows them to exploit a greater variety of small crevices to hide from predators.
 Of all the insects that exist today, the only ones that are unable to fold their wings are dragonflies and damselflies.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus claimed that the solar system revolved around the sun.
 Some thought he was right, but many others believed the opposite, that the solar system, including the Sun itself (and the other stars), was moving around the Earth.
 Which makes sense, because we don't feel the Earth moving, right?
 The Amazon River is the largest and second longest river in the world. It carries 8 times the amount of water that the second largest river carries.
 The Amazon River is also the widest river in the world, with a width that in some places reaches six miles.
 20% of the water that flows from the rivers of the planet into the oceans comes from the Amazon River.
 The main Amazon River is 6,387 km (3,980 miles) long. It is fed by thousands of smaller tributaries.
 Stone pyramids continued to be built until the end of the Old Kingdom, but despite this, the Giza pyramids were never surpassed in terms of size and technical excellence of their construction.
 The ancient Egyptians of the New Kingdom were awed by the monuments of their ancestors, which were more than a thousand years old at the time.
 The Vatican City State has a population of about 800 inhabitants, making it the smallest independent state in the world and the one with the smallest population.
 The official language of the Vatican City for legislation and official communications is Italian.
 Italian is also the everyday language spoken by most people working within the state, while Latin is often used in religious functions.
 In the Vatican City all citizens are Roman Catholics.
 Man has known the basic chemical elements like gold, silver and copper since ancient times: these elements can be found in nature in native form and can be extracted quite simply with the help of primitive tools.
 According to the philosopher Aristotle, everything is made up of a combination of one or more of the following four elements: earth, water, air and fire.
 These in fact resemble more the four states of matter, namely (in the same order): solid, liquid, gaseous and plasma. However, he also theorized that they would transform into new substances, forming what we see.
 Alloys are essentially a mixture of two or more metals. Keep in mind that the periodic table contains numerous elements.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals. Of course, there are also metals like silver and gold.
 There may also be alloys composed of very small amounts of non-metallic elements, such as carbon.
 In the universe, everything is made of matter and all matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are incredibly tiny, so tiny that trillions of them could fit into the point at the end of this sentence.
 After its invention, the pencil has become a good friend to many.
 Unfortunately, with the introduction of new writing methods, the pencil has been relegated to a lower status and less widespread use.
 Today everyone writes messages on computer screens and never needs to approach a thermometer.
 We can only wonder what fate will befall the keyboard when something newer comes along.
 The principle that energy is required to bring together a nucleus with many protons and neutrons is the basis of the operation of the fission bomb.
 It's like rolling a heavy cart up a hill. Then, by splitting the nucleus further, some of that energy is released.
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means that they tend to break apart in the presence of little or no force.
 The surface of the Moon is made up of rocks and dust and its outer layer is called the crust.
 The crust is about 70 km thick on the nearest side and 100 km on the farthest side.
 It is thinner under the seas and thicker under mountainous areas.
 The maria may be more numerous on the near side because the crust is thinner, which has facilitated the upward movement of the lava to the surface.
 Theories of content focus on the search for what satisfies or attracts individuals.
 According to these theories, people have certain needs and/or desires that are internalized as they become adults.
 These theories analyze what unites some people and pushes them to want to do what they do, and what are the factors of the context in which they live that push them to do or not do certain things.
 Among the most popular theories on the subject are Maslow's Hierarchy of Needs and Herzberg's Two-Factor Theory.
 In general, when managers start to manage their former colleagues, two behaviors can emerge. On the one hand, there are those who try to remain "one of the guys" (or the girls).
 The manager of this type finds it difficult to make unpopular decisions, to implement disciplinary actions, to evaluate performance, to define and assign responsibilities.
 On the other hand, the manager becomes a completely different person, who feels that he must change the entire team's work and make it his own.
 In the end, the leader is the person who is ultimately responsible for the success and failure of the team.
 This attitude often creates dissent between leaders and the rest of the team.
 The standard of excellence for virtual teams is similar to that of conventional teams, but with a few small differences.
 Members of the virtual team often have the function of contact point for their next physical group.
 They often have more autonomy than members of conventional teams, as matches can take place according to various time zones, which may not be covered by the local management.
 The existence of a real "invisible team" (Larson and LaFasto, 1989, p109) is also a fundamental element of a virtual team.
 The "invisible team" is the management team to which each member refers and is the one that sets the standards for each member.
 Why would an organization want to go through the long process of building a learning organization? A good reason for implementing the concepts of organizational learning may be innovation.
 When all available resources are used effectively in all functional departments of an organization, creativity and ingenuity can emerge.
 Consequently, the path of collaboration within an organization to overcome an obstacle can lead to a new innovative process to meet the needs of the customer.
 For an organization to be innovative, leaders must create a culture of innovation, as well as shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) illustrates the theory of the continuum as a method used to help organizations reach higher levels of performance.
 Neurobiological results have demonstrated the physical existence of a theoretical approach to the investigation of cognition. The research area becomes narrower and thus much more precise.
 The link between brain disease and behaviour is at the heart of the scientists' research.
 It has long been known that certain types of brain damage, trauma, injury and tumors can affect behavior and modify certain mental functions.
 The introduction of new technologies allows us to see and investigate brain structures and processes that have never been observed before.
 This gives us a great amount of information and material to create simulation models that help us understand our mental processes.
 Although it has a strong science fiction connotation, AI is a very important branch of computer science that deals with intelligent behavior, learning and adaptation of machines.
 AI research includes building machines that can perform tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Some examples of application are control, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to customer diagnoses and questions, as well as the recognition of handwriting, voice and face.
 These things have become distinct disciplines, focusing on providing solutions to real problems.
 AI is now often used in economics, medicine, engineering, and the military, as well as being integrated into various software applications for home computers and video games.
 Field trips are an important part of the curriculum. Often teachers want to take their students to places that are not easily accessible by bus.
 The solution is offered by technology with virtual tours. Students can see the artifacts of museums, visit an aquarium or admire beautiful works of art while sitting in class.
 Sharing a virtual field trip is also a great excuse to share travel experiences and reflections with future classes.
 For example, every year the students of the Bennet School, North Carolina, design a website about their trip to the capital; the website is redesigned every year, but the previous versions are kept online and become an album.
 Blogs can also help students improve their writing. Often, their first blogging experiences are marked by poor grammar and spelling, but the presence of an audience usually changes things.
 Since students are usually the most critical audience, to avoid negative judgments the blog author is committed to improving his writing.
 Blogs also "force students to become more aware of the moment they are in" and the need to keep the audience interested motivates students to be inventive and interesting (Toto, 2004).
 The blog is a tool that aims to encourage collaboration and develop students' learning beyond the normal school day.
 "The proper use of blogs can help students become more critical and analytical. By actively responding to Internet materials, students can define their own position within the writings of others, as well as delineate their own perspectives on specific issues" (Oravec, 2002).
 Ottawa is the bilingual and charming capital of Canada, full of art galleries and museums that tell the past and present of the country.
 Further south are the Niagara Falls and to the north you can admire the natural beauty of the Muskoka region and much more.
 All this and more makes Ontario typically Canadian in the eyes of foreigners.
 The vast areas to the north are sparsely populated, some of them are almost uninhabited wilderness.
 If you compare the population, the result can be surprising for many: in the United States the number of African-American citizens is higher than that of Canadian citizens.
 The islands of East Africa are located in the Indian Ocean, off the east coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and its natural heritage makes it a continent in its own right.
 Almost all the smaller islands, known as luxurious seaside resorts, are mostly independent nations or associated with France.
 In the lands the Arabs also brought Islam, which embarked on a long journey towards the Comoros and Mayotte.
 In the 15th century, the discovery of the Cape route, which goes from Europe to India, by the Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama opened the way to European influence and colonialism.
 To the north, the region is bordered by the Sahel, while to the south and west it is bordered by the Atlantic Ocean.
 For female travellers: it is recommended that all women declare themselves to be married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 It is also useful to wear a ring (but not one that is too expensive).
 Women should be aware that cultural differences may lead to what they consider to be harassment, and that it is not unusual to be followed, grabbed by the arm, etc.
 Be firm in refusing men, and do not be afraid to say no (cultural differences or not, there is no excuse!).
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century BC; under the name of Anfa, it was a strategic port used by the Phoenicians, the Romans and the Merinides.
 The Portuguese destroyed it to rebuild it with the name of Casa Branca, which they abandoned in 1755 following an earthquake.
 The Moroccan sultan rebuilt the city, which was called Daru l-Badya, and then it was called Casablanca by the Spanish merchants who chose this place for their trading bases.
 Throughout Morocco, Casablanca is one of the least interesting cities for shopping.
 In the old Medina, it is easy to find places selling traditional Moroccan products, such as tajin, ceramics, leather goods, hookahs and lots of bric-a-brac, but all this is reserved only for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city in the eastern part of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, not far from Rwanda.
 In 2002, the lava from the Nyiragongo volcano destroyed Goma, burying much of the city's roads, especially those in the center.
 While Goma is reasonably safe, it is advisable to do some research before making any visits outside of Goma, so as to assess the state of the ongoing fighting in the North Kivu province.
 The city is also the starting point for climbing the Nyiragongo volcano, as well as being one of the least expensive opportunities to see the mountain gorillas of Africa.
 It is possible to use a boda-boda (motorcycle taxi) to move around Goma. The normal price (in local currency) is about 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 Also because of its relative inaccessibility, "Timbuktu" has ended up becoming a metaphor for exotic and distant land.
 Today Timbuktu is a decaying city, but for its reputation it remains a tourist attraction, with an airport.
 In 1990 it was included in the list of Unesco heritage sites that are in danger, due to the threat posed by the desert sands.
 In Henry Louis Gates' PBS special "Wonders of the African World," it was one of the featured stops.
 With its more Arabic than African touch, the city stands out from the others in the country.
 The Kruger National Park (KNP) is located in the northeast of South Africa and runs east along the border with Mozambique, north with Zimbabwe, and its southern border is the Crocodile River.
 With an area of 19,500 km², the park encompasses 14 different ecozones, each of which supports a different wildlife population.
 It is one of the main attractions of South Africa and is considered the most important of the South African National Parks (SANParks).
 As with all South African national parks, there is a daily conservation fee and entrance fee to the park.
 A Wild Card is also a good idea, as it gives you access to a selection of parks in South Africa or to all the national parks in South Africa.
 The island of Hong Kong, which gives its name to the entire territory, is the main destination for many tourists.
 The series of buildings that make up Hong Kong's skyline has been compared to a sparkling bar graph, made even more striking by the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 To enjoy the best views of Hong Kong, leave the island and visit the waterfront of Kowloon across the bay.
 Most of Hong Kong's urban development has been concentrated on the reclaimed land of the densely populated northern coast.
 This is the place the English colonists chose for themselves, so if you are looking for evidence of the colonial past of this land, this is a good place to start.
 The Sundarbans are the largest mangrove forest in the world, stretching 80 km (50 mi) from the coast into the interior of Bangladesh and India.
 The Sundarbans have been declared a UNESCO World Heritage Site. The part of the forest that is in Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 However, the forests are not only made up of mangrove swamps: they also contain what remains of the once vast jungles that covered the Ganges plain.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 km², of which about one third is made up of marshy areas.
 Since 1966 the Sundarbans have been a wildlife sanctuary; it is estimated that there are 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer in the area.
 Buses leave from the inter-district bus station (on the other side of the river) throughout the day, although many (especially those going east and Jakar/Bumthang) leave between 06:30 and 07:30.
 As the buses between the different districts are often full, it is best to buy the ticket a few days in advance.
 Most of the neighborhoods are served by convenient and sturdy small Japanese buses.
 Shared taxis are a convenient and quick way to reach nearby locations, including Paro (150 Nu) and Punakha (200 Nu).
 The Oyapock River Bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that connects the city of Oiapoque, Brazil, to Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock, French Guiana.
 Its two pylons are 83 meters high, it is 378 meters long and has two lanes 3.50 meters wide.
 Under the bridge the free vertical space is 15 meters. The construction was completed in August 2011, but the opening to traffic took place only in March 2017.
 By September 2017, when Brazilian customs checkpoints are likely to be completed, the bridge should be fully operational.
 The Guaraní were the most important indigenous group living in present-day eastern Paraguay. They were hunter-gatherers and also practiced subsistence agriculture.
 The Chaco region was inhabited by other indigenous tribes such as the Guaycuru and the Payaguá, who lived off hunting, gathering and fishing.
 Paraguay, formerly called "The great province of the Indies", was born in the sixteenth century from the encounter between the Spanish conquerors and the indigenous native groups.
 The Spanish started a period that lasted three centuries, the period of colonization.
 Since the founding of Asunción in 1537, Paraguay has been able to maintain much of its identity and its own peculiarities.
 Everyone knows that Argentina has one of the best teams and players in the world.
 In December, the most important tournament of the year takes place in the polo fields of Las Cañitas.
 Here you can watch minor tournaments and matches at other times of the year.
 For information on tournaments and tickets for polo matches, please contact the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The Falkland Islands have their own official currency, the Falkland Islands pound (FKP), which is equivalent to the British pound sterling (GBP).
 The only bank on the islands, located in Stanley opposite the FIC West shop, offers currency exchange.
 British pounds are generally accepted everywhere on the islands. In Stanley, credit cards and US dollars are often accepted.
 It is likely that on the outlying islands they will not accept credit cards, although British and US currency may be accepted. Check with the owners in advance to decide on an acceptable method of payment.
 It is almost impossible to change money outside the Falkland Islands, so change your money before you leave.
 Since Montevideo is south of the Equator, it is summer when it is winter in the northern hemisphere and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropical region; during the summer months temperatures over 30°C are quite normal.
 Winter can be deceptively cold: temperatures rarely fall below freezing, but the combination of wind and humidity can make it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no defined "dry" and "rainy" seasons: the amount of rain remains more or less constant throughout the year.
 Although many of the animals in the park are used to seeing people, the wildlife is still wild and should not be fed or disturbed.
 Park authorities recommend keeping at least 100 yards/meters away from bears and wolves and 25 yards/meters away from all other wildlife.
 No matter how docile they may seem: bison, elk, deer, bears, practically all large animals can attack.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured for not keeping a safe distance. It is necessary to leave these animals enough space as they are large, wild and potentially dangerous animals.
 Also, keep in mind that odors can attract bears and other wildlife, so avoid bringing or cooking foods with strong odors, and keep your campsite clean.
 Apia is the capital of the Samoa Islands. It is located on the island of Upolu and has a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded between 1850 and 1860 and is the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 In this port there was the infamous 1889 Shipwreck, in which seven ships from Germany, the United States and Great Britain refused to leave the port.
 All the ships were sunk, except for a British cruiser. Nearly 200 American and German lives were lost.
 During the Mau movement's struggle for independence, a peaceful rally in the town led to the killing of Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III, the supreme chief.
 There are many beaches, as Auckland is located between two harbours. The most popular are divided into three areas.
 The beaches of the North Shore (in the North Harbour district) stretch from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 These are mainly sandy beaches, safe for swimming, and most of them enjoy the shade of pohutukawa trees.
 The beaches of Tamaki Drive in Auckland Central, the elegant suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers, overlook Waitemata Harbour.
 These are family-friendly beaches, sometimes a bit crowded, surrounded by a wide range of shops and safe for swimming.
 The most well-known local beer is a non-complex, refreshing and pleasant beer called "Number One". The other local beer is called "Manta".
 You can have many French wines, but Australian and New Zealand wines could better face the journey.
 The tap water is perfectly safe to drink, but if you're worried, bottled water is easy to find.
 According to Australians, the flat white coffee is a foreign idea. The espresso is the short black coffee, the cappuccino is covered with cream (not foam) and the tea is served without milk.
 Hot chocolate is on par with Belgian chocolate. Fruit juices are expensive, but very good.
 Throughout the year, many excursions are made on the coral reef and accidents for one of these causes on the coral reef are rare.
 Always ask the authorities for advice, follow the instructions and pay particular attention to safety warnings.
 Cubomedusae appear from October to April near beaches and river estuaries north of Seventeen Seventy. Outside this period they can only be found occasionally.
 Sharks are present, but rarely attack humans. Most sharks fear humans and tend to keep their distance.
 The habitat of saltwater crocodiles is mainly the estuaries of the rivers north of Rockhampton, as they do not actively live in the ocean.
 By booking in advance, the traveller has the peace of mind of finding a place to sleep once he or she arrives at the destination.
 Travel agencies often have agreements with certain hotels, but it is still possible to book other forms of accommodation, such as camping, through the same agencies.
 Travel agencies generally offer packages including breakfast, transfers to / from the airport or even combined flight + hotel packages.
 They can also hold the reservation for you if you need time to think about the offer or to get further documents required for your destination (e.g. visa).
 However, any changes or requests must be made to the travel agent and not directly to the hotel.
 At some music festivals, most of the participants decide to camp on site, considering this aspect a crucial element of the experience.
 To be close to the action, you need to get there early and grab a space near the music.
 Remember that once the music on the main stages is over, there may be sections of the festival where the music goes on until late into the night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with young children.
 If you cross the northern Baltic Sea in winter, check the location of your cabin, as ice-crossing can be quite noisy for those who are more exposed to it.
 St. Petersburg cruises include time to explore the city. Cruise passengers are granted visa-free entry (check conditions).
 Generally, casinos do everything to increase the time and money spent by their guests as much as possible. There are usually no windows or clocks, and exits can be hard to find.
 They usually offer food, drinks and entertainment to keep guests happy and to make them stay longer.
 In some establishments alcoholic beverages are offered by the house. However, the state of intoxication impairs the ability to judge and every good gambler knows how important it is to stay sober.
 Anyone who decides to drive at high altitudes or on mountain passes must take into account the possibility of snow, ice or near-zero temperatures.
 On icy and snow-covered roads, the friction is reduced and it is not possible to drive as when you are on clean asphalt.
 In a snowstorm, so much snow can fall so quickly that you can get stuck.
 Even precipitation and gusts of snow, or the formation of ice or condensation on the vehicle windows, can reduce visibility.
 However, ice and snow are normal conditions in many countries, and traffic continues to flow almost uninterrupted throughout the year.
 Safaris are probably the greatest tourist attraction in Africa and the focus of many visitors' holidays.
 In its popular use, the term safari refers to overland travel, particularly in the savannah, to see the beautiful African wildlife.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, tend to come closer to cars, so a normal camera equipment is sufficient to get a good view.
 Lions, cheetahs and leopards are sometimes shy and can be observed best with binoculars.
 A walking safari (also called "bush walk", "safari escursionistico", or "walking safari") is an excursion that can last a few hours or several days.
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2012, and some events will be held in other locations across Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Summer Olympic Games, having hosted the first in 1964.
 If your booking for flights and accommodation for 2020 was made before the postponement was announced, you may find yourself in a difficult situation.
 Cancellation policies vary, however most of the cancellation policies related to the coronavirus, at the end of March 2020, do not go up to July 2020, when the Olympics are scheduled.
 It is expected that the cost of most of the event tickets will be between 2,500 yen and 130,000 yen, while normal tickets will cost around 7,000 yen.
 Ironing wet clothes can help them dry faster. Many hotels offer the use of an iron and ironing board, even if they are not in the room.
 If you do not have an iron, or you do not like wearing ironed socks, you can try with a hair dryer, if you have one.
 Be careful not to subject the fabrics to too high temperatures, to avoid shrinkage or, in the worst case, burns.
 There are various ways to sanitize water and some of these are more effective against specific risks.
 In some areas it is enough to boil the water for a minute, in others it takes many minutes.
 The effectiveness of filters is variable, so in case of doubt it is advisable to evaluate the purchase of bottled water in sealed bottles from a reliable company.
 Travellers may come into contact with animal parasites that are not found in their home regions.
 Parasites can spoil food, cause irritation or, in the worst case, cause allergic reactions, as well as transmit poison or infections.
 The same infectious diseases and dangerous animals that can injure or kill people with force are not usually classified as harmful animals.
 Duty Free shopping is an opportunity to buy tax-free products in certain locations.
 Travelers heading to countries with high taxes can sometimes save a lot, especially on products like alcohol and tobacco.
 The Buffalo-Pittsburgh stretch of I-79 between Point Marion and Fairmont is the most difficult stretch to drive, as it often passes through isolated areas of vegetation.
 If you are not used to driving on country roads, it is advisable to keep your eyes wide open, as there are steep slopes, narrow roads and sharp bends.
 The speed limits shown are much lower than those applied on the previous and following stretches (normally 35-40 mph / 56-64 km/h). Their strict observance is extremely important.
 Strangely, however, in this area the level of mobile phone coverage is much higher than in other stretches of the route, for example in the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German desserts are quite good and in Bavaria are quite tasty and varied, similar to those of neighboring Austria to the south.
 Fruit desserts are a classic, from those with apples available all year round to those with cherries and plums, which appear during the summer.
 Several German baked goods also contain almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts. The most popular cakes are often very well accompanied by a cup of strong coffee.
 If you want to try small but tasty cakes, you can choose those that, depending on the region, are called Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen.
 Curry is a dish made with herbs and spices mixed with meat or vegetables.
 Curry can be "dry" or "wet", depending on the amount of liquid it contains.
 In northern India and Pakistan, curries in the interior regions are usually made with yogurt; in southern India and some other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is more commonly used.
 With 17,000 islands to choose from, the term Indonesian cuisine is a generic term covering a wide variety of regional cuisines found in the country.
 However, when used without further specification, the term generally refers to foods originating from the central and eastern part of the main island, Java.
 The cuisine of Java, now widely diffused throughout the archipelago, offers a series of dishes of simple preparation; its predominant flavors are given by the use of peanuts, chili peppers, sugar (especially the Javanese coconut sugar) and various aromatic spices.
 The stirrups are supports for the rider's feet and are hung on either side of the saddle.
 They provide more stability for the rider but can present safety issues due to the possibility that the rider's feet can become trapped.
 If a jockey is thrown off a horse but has a foot caught in the stirrup, he could be dragged along by the horse as it runs away. To minimize this risk, there are some safety measures that can be taken.
 First of all, most riders wear riding boots with a heel and a rather thin, smooth sole.
 Subsequently some saddles, especially English ones, have included safety bars, which make a leather stirrup break away from the saddle when, in case of a fall, the rider pulls it back.
 Cochamó Valley: the most important climbing destination in Chile, known as the Yosemite of South America, where a large number of enormous granite walls and cliffs are climbed.
 The peaks of the mountains include breathtaking views. Climbers from all over the world are constantly tracing new routes on its walls, potentially endless.
 Snow sports such as skiing and snowboarding are very popular and involve sliding down snow using skis or a snowboard.
 Skiing is one of the main tourist activities and has many enthusiasts, sometimes called "ski bums", who dedicate entire holiday periods to skiing in a particular area.
 The principle behind skiing is very old: the first cave paintings with the depiction of humans skiing date back to 5000 BC!
 Alpine skiing as a sport has its origins at least in the 17th century; in 1861 the first recreational ski club in Australia was opened by Norwegians.
 Ski touring: the activity is also called off-piste, ski mountaineering or ski trekking.
 It is related, though usually not included, to touring or skimo, which are practiced on steep terrain and require much stiffer skis and boots.
 Think of the ski slope as a hiking trail.
 If conditions are good, you can cover somewhat longer distances than when walking, but you will rarely reach the speeds of cross-country skiing without a heavy backpack on groomed trails.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but it is made up of many independent countries. Normally, to travel through several countries you would have to apply for a visa and go through passport control several times.
 However, in this respect, the Schengen area works more like a single country.
 If you stay within this area, you can usually go from one border to the other without having to go through passport control again.
 Likewise, if you have a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for individual visas for each member country, thus saving time, money and bureaucracy.
 There is no universal definition of what makes an item an antique. Some tax agencies consider an item to be at least 100 years old.
 The definition has geographical differences from the age limit which can be lower, as in the case of North America compared to Europe.
 Craft items could be defined as antiques, even if they are more recent than similar mass-produced items.
 Reindeer herding is an important source of livelihood for the Sámi and the culture on which this trade is based is also the basis of many other professions.
 Even in the course of time, not all Sámi have been involved in reindeer herding on a large scale; some lived of fishing, hunting and similar activities, using reindeer mainly as work animals.
 Today many Sámi have modern professions. Tourism is an important source of income in Sápmi, the Sámi homeland.
 Although widely used, especially among non-Roma, the word "Gypsy" is often considered offensive because it is associated with negative stereotypes and a misperception of Roma people.
 If a travel warning is issued for the destination you are visiting, there may be consequences for your travel insurance or your cancellation insurance.
 You may also be interested in the opinions of governments other than your own, but keep in mind that these opinions are aimed at the citizens of those governments.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may encounter different situations than Europeans or Arabs.
 The alerts are simply a brief summary of the political situation in a country.
 The opinions reported are often superficial, general and simplistic compared to the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 "Adverse weather conditions" is the general expression used to describe any dangerous weather phenomenon that can cause damage, serious social disruption or loss of life.
 Extreme weather can occur anywhere in the world, and there are many different types, depending on geography, topography and atmospheric conditions.
 Strong winds, hail, excessive rainfall and uncontrolled fires are manifestations and consequences of adverse weather conditions, such as thunderstorms, tornadoes, sea-storms and cyclones.
 Among the regional and seasonal weather phenomena of strong intensity are thunderstorms, snowstorms, ice storms and sandstorms.
 Travellers are advised to check the weather conditions in their area, as they may affect their travel plans.
 Anyone planning to visit a country that is potentially considered a war zone should undergo professional training.
 Searching the Internet for 'Survival course' is likely to find the address of a local company.
 A course will normally cover all the issues discussed here in much more detail, usually with practical experience.
 A course typically lasts from 2 to 5 days and includes role-playing games as well as many first aid and sometimes weapons training activities.
 Books and magazines about survival in the wild are popular, while publications about war zones are few.
 Travellers planning to have gender reassignment surgery abroad should make sure they have the right documents for their return journey.
 The intention of governments to issue passports without gender indications (X) or updated documents to match a desired name and gender is variable.
 Equally variable is the willingness of foreign governments to accept such documents.
 Even security checks have become much more thorough in the post-9/11 era.
 Transgender people in the pre-operative stage should not expect to pass through security without their privacy and dignity being violated.
 Rip currents are formed by the return flow of waves that break on the beach, often near a coral reef or similar formation.
 Given the submarine topography, the return flow is concentrated in some deeper sections where a strong current can form towards the open sea.
 Most deaths occur due to exhaustion while trying to swim against the current, which can be impossible.
 As soon as you get out of the current, swimming back will not be as difficult as it was before.
 Try to find a place where you won't be trapped again, or consider waiting for help, depending on your skills and whether you've been spotted.
 The culture shock is manifested in a shorter time than the cultural shock (as there is a "honeymoon" phase more reduced), lasts longer and can be more serious.
 Travelers who have found it easy to adapt to the new culture sometimes have difficulty readjusting to the culture of their home country.
 When you return home after living abroad, you will have adapted to the new culture and lost some of the customs of your home country.
 In your first experience abroad, you are likely to have met patient and understanding people, aware that travelers in a new country need to adapt.
 Many people did not imagine that patience and awareness were also necessary for those returning home.
 The pyramid's light and sound show is the most interesting thing for children in the area.
 Before the show begins, you can admire the pyramids in the darkness and silence.
 You can always hear the noise of tourists and vendors. The show of lights and sounds is just like a book of stories.
 The Sphinx becomes the backdrop and the narrator of a long story.
 The scenes are projected onto the pyramids and each pyramid is lit.
 Claimed by various countries, the South Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, have the largest number of bases, sixteen of which were active in 2020.
 The archipelago is 120 km north of the mainland. King George Island is the largest and is home to the town of Villa Las Estrellas.
 Among the other islands are Livingston Island and Deception; in the latter, the caldera of an active volcano filled with water from the origin of a magnificent natural harbor.
 Ellsworth Land is the region that lies to the south of the peninsula and faces the Bellingshausen Sea.
 Here the mountains of the peninsula merge into the plateau, to re-emerge and form the Ellsworth Mountains, a 360 km long chain cut in two by the Minnesota Glacier.
 The northern part, known as the Sentinel Range, has the highest mountains in Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, which reaches 4,892 m (16,050 ft) with Mount Vinson.
 In remote areas with no cell phone coverage, a satellite phone may be the only option.
 A satellite phone is not generally a substitute for a cell phone, because you need to be outdoors with a clear view of the satellite to make a call.
 The service is often used by pleasure craft, including pleasure craft, as well as by missions that need data and voice at a distance.
 Your local telephone service provider should be able to provide you with more information about connecting to this service.
 One of the most popular options for those who plan to take a gap year is to travel and learn.
 It is particularly popular among recent graduates, as they can take a year off before starting university without compromising their education.
 In many cases, enrolling in a course abroad during the gap year can actually increase the chances of returning to higher education back home.
 Usually, enrolling in these educational programs requires payment of a fee.
 Finland is a great destination for boating. In the "Land of a thousand lakes" there are also thousands of islands, in the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 You don’t need a yacht for the archipelagos and lakes.
 While the coastal archipelagos and larger lakes are certainly large enough for any yacht, smaller boats or even kayaks offer a different experience.
 Boating is the national pastime of Finland, where there is one boat for every seven or eight people.
 This is also the case in Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but is generally quite rare (for example, in the Netherlands the ratio is one to forty).
 Most of the different Baltic cruises include a multi-day stay in St. Petersburg, Russia.
 This means that you can visit the historic town for two full days, returning to the ship in the evening to sleep.
 No separate visa will be required for disembarkation (as of 2009) using the ship's shore excursions.
 Some brochures also offer cruises to Berlin, Germany. As you can see from the map above, Berlin is not near the sea, and the city visit is not included in the cruise price.
 Flying can be scary for people of all ages and conditions, especially if they have never flown before or have had some traumatic experience.
 There is nothing to be ashamed of: it is no different from the fears and personal aversions that many people manifest towards other things.
 For some people, understanding a little bit about how airplanes work and what happens during a flight can be helpful in overcoming a fear based on the unknown, or the fact that you don't have control.
 Courier services are well paid to deliver products quickly. Often the timing is very important in the case of business documents, goods or spare parts for an urgent repair.
 For some routes the larger companies used their own aircraft, but for other routes and for smaller companies there were problems.
 On some routes, air shipments would have taken days to unload and clear customs.
 The only way to get it there faster would be to ship it as checked baggage, and that's where you come in, since airline regulations don't allow you to ship baggage without a passenger.
 To fly first or business class, the obvious way is to pay a lot of money for the privilege (or, even better, convince your company to do it).
 However, the price you pay is high: you can expect to pay up to four times the normal economy fare for Business travel and up to eleven times the fare for First Class travel!
 In general, on direct flights from A to B it is not even worth looking for discounts on first class or business class seats.
 Airlines know that there is a category of travelers who are willing to pay a lot of money for the privilege of getting to their destination quickly and comfortably, and they charge accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau and the local language is Romanian, but Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a multi-ethnic republic that has been the scene of ethnic conflict in the past.
 In 1994, the conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Republic of Transnistria in the eastern part of Moldova, with its own government and currency, but not recognized by any UN member state.
 Despite the failure of the political negotiations, economic relations between these two parts of Moldova have been restored.
 The predominant religion in Moldova is Christian Orthodox.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of about 3.7 million people; it is the second largest port after Istanbul and an important transport hub.
 The ancient city of Smyrna is located on a huge bay, is surrounded by mountains and is currently a modern, developed and active trade center.
 Although the city has a Mediterranean feel, with wide boulevards, glass-fronted buildings and modern shopping malls, it is dotted with the characteristic red-tiled roofs, the 18th-century market and ancient mosques and churches.
 In the village of Haldarsvik you can enjoy beautiful views of the nearby island of Eysturoy and you can visit a unique octagonal church.
 In the churchyard, on some of the tombs, there are interesting marble sculptures of doves.
 A half hour is enough to walk around the charming village.
 To the north is the romantic and enchanting city of Sintra, easily accessible and made famous by the brilliant account of its splendours written by Lord Byron.
 The Scotturb 403 bus line runs regularly to Sintra, and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Also to the north, visit the great sanctuary of Our Lady of Fatima (place of worship), a place of Marian apparitions famous all over the world.
 Remember that the site you are visiting is basically a mass grave, and has an incalculable significance for a large part of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women who survived these places, and many others who saw their loved ones murdered or worked to death, both Jewish and non-Jewish.
 Treat the place with all the dignity, seriousness and respect it deserves. Avoid jokes about the Holocaust or Nazis.
 Avoid defacing these places by marking the structures with graffiti or tags.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. About half of the population prefers to speak Catalan, and the vast majority can understand it; Spanish is known by virtually everyone.
 However, most signs are written exclusively in Catalan, which is the official first language by law.
 Spanish, however, is widely used for public transport and other services.
 On the metro, regular announcements are only in Catalan, but any unscheduled service interruptions are communicated in a wide variety of languages including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese, thanks to an automated system.
 Parisians are known to be self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 Although it is often an inaccurate stereotype, the best way to get along in Paris is to behave as a "bien élevé" (well-bred) person would, which will make your travels much easier.
 The rough exterior of Parisians will quickly melt away if you show some basic good manners.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is rich in forests, mainly beech, fir and spruce, and is characterized by a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 Thanks to a variety of microclimates, soils and altitude levels, it has a great variety of plant communities.
 The area also hosts a great variety of animal and bird species.
 Rare species such as the European brown bear, wolf, eagle, owl, lynx, wild cat and capercaillie live in these areas, along with many other more common species.
 When visiting monasteries, women are required to wear skirts that cover their knees and shoulders.
 Most monasteries provide stoles for women who arrive unprepared, but if you already have one, especially if it is brightly coloured, you will earn a smile from the monk or nun at the entrance.
 Similarly, men are required to wear long pants below the knees.
 These can also be borrowed from the store at the entrance; however, the clothes are not washed after each user, so wearing these skirts may not feel comfortable. For men, one size fits all!
 The cuisine of Majorca, like that of similar Mediterranean areas, is based on bread, vegetables and meat (especially pork) and uses olive oil everywhere.
 Pa amb oli is a simple, popular summer dish: bread with olive oil, tomato and any other condiments you can find, such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 All nouns, as well as the pronoun "Sie" used for the polite form of "you", always begin with a capital letter, even if they appear in the middle of a sentence.
 This is an important mechanism for distinguishing certain verbs and complements.
 This aspect probably also facilitates reading, although the need to understand whether a verb or an adjective is used in a substantivized form makes the writing rather complex.
 Italian pronunciation is relatively simple since most words are pronounced as they are written.
 The main letters to pay attention to are the c and the g, since their pronunciation changes depending on the vowel that follows.
 Also make sure you pronounce "r" and "rr" differently: caro means dear, while carro means carriage.
 Persian has a relatively simple and mostly regular grammar.
 So, reading this basic grammar book could help you a lot with Persian grammar and understanding sentences.
 It goes without saying that if you already know a Romance language, learning Portuguese will be easier.
 However, people with a minimum knowledge of Spanish may come to the precipitous conclusion that Portuguese is similar enough and therefore need not be studied separately.
 Usually today pre-modern observatories are obsolete and serve as museums or educational sites.
 Since light pollution was not a problem in their heyday, they are usually located in cities or on campuses, which are more easily accessible than those built in modern times.
 Most modern research telescopes are huge structures in remote areas where the weather is favourable.
 The admiration of the cherry blossoms, known as hanami, has been part of Japanese culture since the 8th century.
 The concept originated in China, where the flowering of plum trees was preferred.
 In Japan, the first cherry blossom parties were organized by the emperor for himself and other members of the aristocracy close to the imperial court.
 Plants thrive best when they are in their natural environment, so resist the temptation to take just one plant.
 If you visit an Italian garden, even collecting some specimens of plants will cost you the removal from this place, without discussion.
 In general, Singapore is a very safe and easy city to get around; you can buy just about anything once you arrive.
 But being in the "high tropics", just a few degrees north of the equator, you will have to deal with the heat (always) and the strong sun (more rarely, when the sky is clear).
 Some buses also go north to Hebron, the traditional burial place of the biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac and Jacob and their wives.
 Make sure the bus you want to take goes into Hebron and not to the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a great theme around which to organize a vacation.
 For example, you can visit the castles in the Loire Valley and the Rhine Valley, you can take a cruise to visit the interesting cities on the Danube or you can sail on the Erie Canal.
 They also define the routes of very well-known hiking trails and bicycle paths.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays in Christianity and celebrates the birth of Jesus.
 Many of the traditions associated with this holiday have been adopted by non-Christians in Christian countries and by non-Christians around the world.
 A tradition is to spend the Easter night awake in an open place to be able to admire the sunrise.
 There are of course Christian theological explanations for this tradition, but it could just as well be a pre-Christian fertility ritual.
 In more traditional churches, a Paschal Vigil is often held on the Saturday night of the Easter weekend, with congregations often beginning the ceremony at midnight to celebrate the resurrection of Christ.
 All the animals that originally came to the islands arrived by swimming, flying or floating.
 Since the distance from the mainland was considerable, the mammals could not make the journey, and this meant that the giant tortoise became the main grazing animal in the Galapagos.
 Many mammals such as goats, horses, cows, rats, dogs and cats were introduced to the Galapagos after the arrival of man.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic during the winter, you will experience polar night, when the sun remains below the horizon.
 This phenomenon offers the opportunity to witness the aurora borealis, because the sky remains dark almost all day.
 Since the territories are sparsely populated, light pollution is often not a problem and you can even enjoy the stars.
 In Japan, the work culture is more hierarchical and formal than what Westerners tend to be used to.
 Office wear is usually a jacket and tie or a suit and one addresses colleagues by their surname or professional title.
 The harmony of the workplace is of crucial importance, as it gives importance to the commitment of the group rather than praising individual achievements.
 Workers must often receive the approval of their superiors for every decision, and are expected to follow instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.3488685943645658, 'precisions': [0.6628407460545194, 0.4134883157767284, 0.2794866400168315, 0.1933810926031732], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.043202135835929, 'translation_length': 25789, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 63.075396440161505, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}